Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2178] University
of Hawaii-Hilo theatre special fund. There is established the University
of Hawaii-Hilo theatre special fund, which shall consist of admissions,
advertising sales, corporate sponsorships, marketing, merchandising, donations,
fundraising, fees, charges, and other moneys collected in conjunction with the
University of Hawaii-Hilo theatre program. The special fund shall be
administered by the office of administrative affairs of the University of
Hawaii at Hilo. Funds may be expended for all costs associated with the theatre
program, including artists' fees, production costs, personnel costs, honoraria,
per diem, hotel and room rentals, food and refreshments, printing and mailing,
advertising, airfare, leis, rental or purchase of equipment, and theater
supplies and materials. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 124, §10]

Revision Note

Section was renumbered from §304A-2271 pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next